Maryland, session 2025, SB0400.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Human Services
8–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(p) (1) “Residential child care program” means an entity that provides 24–hour
per day care for children within a structured set of services and activities that are designed
to achieve specific objectives relative to the needs of the children served and that include
the provision of food, clothing, shelter, education, social services, health, mental health,
recreation, or any combination of these services and activities.
(2) “Residential child care program” includes a program:
(i) licensed by:
1. the Maryland Department of Health;
2. the Department of Human Services; or
3. the Department of Juvenile Services; and
(ii) that is subject to the licensing regulations of the members of the
Children’s Cabinet governing the operations of residential child care programs.
Subtitle 7. Residential Child Care Programs – General Provisions.
8–713. RESERVED.
8–714. RESERVED.
PART III. TRANSPORTATION COMPANIES.

SENATE BILL 400 3
8–715.
(A) IN THIS PART THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “CHILD” DOES NOT INCLUDE AN INDIVIDUAL IN THE CARE, CUSTODY,
OR GUARDIANSHIP OF A LOCAL DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL SERVICES.
(B) (C) (B) (1) “RESIDENTIAL CHILD CARE PROGRAM” INCLUDES A
FACILITY OR PROGRAM THAT:
(I) PROVIDES A RESIDENTIAL ENVIRONMENT SUCH AS:
1. A PROGRAM WITH A WILDERNESS OR OUTDOOR
EXPERIENCE, EXPEDITION, OR INTERVENTION;
2. A BOOT CAMP EXPERIENCE OR OTHER EXPERIENCE
DESIGNED TO SIMULATE CHARACTERISTICS OF BASIC MILITARY TRAINING FOR
CORRECTIONAL REGIMES;
3. AN EDUCATIONAL OR THERAPEUTIC BOARDING
SCHOOL; OR
4. A BEHAVIORAL MODIFICATION PROGRAM; AND
(II) SERVES YOUTH CHILDREN WHO HAVE A HISTORY OF
DIAGNOSIS OF:
1. AN EMOTIONAL, BEHAVIORAL, OR MENTAL HEALTH
DISORDER;
2. A SUBSTANCE MISUSE OR USE DISORDER, INCLUDING
ALCOHOL MISUSE OR USE DISORDER; OR
3. AN INTELLECTUAL, DEVELOPMENTAL, PHYSICAL, OR
SENSORY DISABILITY.
(2) “RESIDENTIAL CHILD CARE PROGRAM” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) A HOSPITAL LICENSED BY THE STATE;
(II) A DETENTION FACILITY LICENSED BY THE STATE;
(III) A YOUTH CORRECTIONAL FACILITY;

SENATE BILL 400
(IV) A SUBSTANCE ABUSE TREATMENT FACILITY;
(V) A FOSTER FAMILY HOME:
1. THAT PROVIDES 24–HOUR SUBSTITUTE CARE FOR
CHILDREN PLACED AWAY FROM THEIR PARENTS OR GUARDIANS;
2. FOR WHICH THE STATE CHILD WELFARE SERVICES
AGENCY HAS PLACEMENT AND CARE RESPONSIBILITY; AND
3. THAT IS LICENSED AND REGULATED BY THE STATE AS
A FOSTER FAMILY HOME; OR
(VI) ANY OTHER SECURE FACILITY.
(C) (D) (C) “YOUTH TRANSPORTATION COMPANY” MEANS A BUSINESS THAT
SPECIALIZES IN TRANSPORTING A PERSON CHILD TO A RESIDENTIAL CHILD CARE
PROGRAM.
8–716.
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, WHILE TRANSPORTING
CHILDREN TO A RESIDENTIAL CHILD CARE PROGRAM, WHEN THE FINAL INTENDED
DESTINATION IS A RESIDENTIAL CHILD CARE PROGRAM AND SUBJECT TO
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A YOUTH TRANSPORTATION COMPANY MAY NOT
USE:
(1) VISUAL IMPAIRMENT, SUCH AS BLINDFOLDS AND HOODS; OR
(2) PHYSICAL OR MECHANICAL RESTRAINTS, SUCH AS HANDCUFFS,
CHAINS, IRONS, STRAITJACKETS, CLOTH RESTRAINTS, LEATHER RESTRAINTS,
PLASTIC RESTRAINTS, OR OTHER SIMILAR ITEMS; OR
(3) PHYSICAL RESTRAINTS, INCLUDING HOLDS, OR OTHER USE OF
PHYSICAL FORCE TO RESTRICT FREE MOVEMENT, UNLESS:
(I) THE RESTRAINTS ARE NECESSARY DUE TO AN IMMEDIATE
AND SERIOUS RISK OF DANGEROUS OR DISRUPTIVE BEHAVIOR A SUBSTANTIAL
LIKELIHOOD OF IMMINENT SERIOUS PHYSICAL HARM TO A CHILD OR OTHERS; AND
(II) THERE ARE NO LESS RESTRICTIVE ALTERNATIVES THAT
WILL ALLEVIATE THE IMMEDIATE AND SERIOUS RISK OF DANGEROUS OR

SENATE BILL 400 5
DISRUPTIVE BEHAVIOR SUBSTANTIAL LIKELIHOOD OF IMMINENT SERIOUS
PHYSICAL HARM TO THE CHILD OR OTHERS.
(B) (1) PHYSICAL RESTRAINTS MAY NOT BE USED:
(I) AS PUNISHMENT;
(II) FOR CONVENIENCE; OR
(III) AS A SUBSTITUTE FOR STAFF SUPERVISION.
(2) ONLY YOUTH TRANSPORTATION COMPANY STAFF WHO HAVE
BEEN ADEQUATELY TRAINED IN RESTRAINT DEVICE USAGE MAY USE AND APPLY
RESTRAINTS DURING TRANSPORTATION.
(3) IF RESTRAINTS ARE NECESSARY DUE TO A SUBSTANTIAL
LIKELIHOOD OF IMMINENT SERIOUS PHYSICAL HARM TO A CHILD OR OTHERS, THE
RESTRAINTS MAY BE USED ONLY AS LONG AS THE IMMINENT RISK PERSISTS.
(C) (1) A EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
WHEN THE FINAL INTENDED DESTINATION IS A RESIDENTIAL CHILD CARE PROGRAM,
A YOUTH TRANSPORTATION COMPANY MAY NOT PICK UP A CHILD FOR TRANSPORT
TO A RESIDENTIAL CHILD CARE PROGRAM BETWEEN THE HOURS OF 9 P.M. AND 6
A.M.
(2) PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A
YOUTH TRANSPORTATION COMPANY UNDER CONTRACT WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF
HUMAN SERVICES.
8–717.
(A) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY BRING AN ACTION AGAINST A YOUTH TRANSPORTATION
COMPANY FOR A VIOLATION OF § 8–716 OF THIS PART.
(2) IN AN ACTION BROUGHT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY SEEK:
(I) INJUNCTIVE RELIEF; AND
(II) STATUTORY DAMAGES UP TO:
1. $1,000 FOR A FIRST OFFENSE; AND

SENATE BILL 400
2. $3,000 FOR A SUBSEQUENT OFFENSE.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AN
INDIVIDUAL MAY BRING AN ACTION AGAINST A YOUTH TRANSPORTATION COMPANY
FOR A VIOLATION OF § 8–716 OF THIS PART.
(2) IN AN ACTION BROUGHT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, THE
INDIVIDUAL MAY SEEK:
(I) RESTITUTION; AND
(II) COMPENSATORY DAMAGES;
(III) STATUTORY DAMAGES UP TO $500 PER VIOLATION; AND
(II) (IV) IF AWARDED RESTITUTION OR DAMAGES,
REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES.
(3) IF THE COURT DETERMINES THAT AN ACTION IS FRIVOLOUS OR
BROUGHT IN BAD FAITH UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, THE COURT MAY ORDER THE
OFFENDING PARTY TO PAY THE REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES OF THE OTHER
PARTY. AN ACTION BROUGHT UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE FILED WITHIN 10
YEARS AFTER THE DATE THAT THE VICTIM REACHES THE AGE OF MAJORITY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any cause of action arising before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.